Louisiana, session 2026, HB1003.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3982(B)(2)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:10.7.1(J) is hereby enacted and to read as follows:
§10.7.1. Return of certain schools from the Recovery School District to the
transferring school system; timeline; conditions; funding
* * *
J.(1)(a) The local school board shall adopt a policy to define, monitor, and
mitigate systemwide overcapacity relative to the number of operating schools in
accordance with the provisions of this Subsection.
(b) The policy shall establish quantitative standards for overcapacity of
schools with jurisdiction over grades kindergarten through eight and schools with
jurisdiction over grades nine through twelve. At a minimum, the metrics for such
standards shall include the following:
(i) Student enrollment projections.
(ii) Student demographic projections.
(iii) Programmatic seat capacity.
(iv) Facility utilization targets.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1003 ENROLLED
(c) The local superintendent shall submit a written report utilizing the most
recent enrollment data available to the school board by November fifteenth annually.
The report shall include a formal determination of whether the district is in a status
of overcapacity of schools with jurisdiction over grades kindergarten through eight,
schools with jurisdiction over grades nine through twelve, or both categories of
schools. An overcapacity status shall remain in effect until the local superintendent
submits a report demonstrating such status no longer exists.
(d) Upon a determination of overcapacity, the local superintendent shall
recommend to the school board specific actions to be implemented the following
school year to mitigate overcapacity. The local superintendent shall submit the
recommendations by December fifteenth of the same calendar year that the local
superintendent submits the report pursuant to Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph, or
at the school board or committee meeting where charter renewal recommendations
are presented, whichever occurs first. In determining the recommendations, the local
superintendent shall consider relevant factors including but not limited to district
accountability policies and academic performance standards.
(e) The local superintendent may implement recommendations submitted to
the board pursuant to Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph, unless the board rejects the
recommendations by a two-thirds vote of the total membership of the board within
thirty days after submission of the recommendations to the board, or by
December thirty-first of the same calendar year as submission of the
recommendations to the board, whichever occurs first.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, administrative rule, or terms
of any charter contract or agreement to the contrary, the following provisions shall
apply when a status of overcapacity is in effect:
(a) The local school board may terminate a charter contract prior to its
expiration to address overcapacity of schools, provided the termination is consistent
with the policy adopted pursuant to the Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(b) No new school shall open that has jurisdiction over the grade levels in
which overcapacity exists. If the local school board changes the operator of an
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1003 ENROLLED
existing school due to failure to meet district academic performance standards, such
school shall not be considered a new school for purposes of this Subparagraph.
(c) If a school building is vacated during a time when a status of
overcapacity of schools is in effect, upon a recommendation of the local
superintendent approved by a majority vote of the local school board, the school
district shall be exempt from the provisions of R.S. 17:3982(B)(2)(a).
* * *
§3982. Local school boards; duties; Orleans Parish School Board; immovable
property; sale or lease
* * *
B.
* * *
(2)(a)(i) The Orleans Parish School Board shall make available to chartering
groups, for lease or purchase up to fair market value, any school facility or other
immovable property, whether improved or unimproved, that is owned by the school
board and that is vacant or slated to be vacant. In the case of a Type 2 charter school
created as a result of a conversion, the immovable property, including any
unimproved property, and all other school board property within the existing school
shall be made available to that chartering group. In return for the use of the facility
and its contents, the chartering group shall pay a proportionate share of the local
school board's bonded indebtedness to be calculated in the same manner as set forth
in R.S. 17:1990(C)(2)(a)(i). If such facilities were constructed at no cost to the local
school board, then such facilities including all equipment, books, instructional
materials, and furniture within such facilities shall be provided to the charter school
at no cost.
(ii) The provisions of this Subparagraph shall not apply to certain vacant
property as provided in R.S. 17:10.7.1(J).
* * *
Section 2 This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1003 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.